src/adv-sjd-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON adv
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Adverb
! lexical adverbs
чофта adv "много / очень / much" ;
четк adv "насмерть / to death" ;

! ?derived adverbs from adjectives; suffix /-as/ <-ас>; weak grade, depalatalization (incl. velar umlaut)
маӈас adv "назад / back (direction)" ; !derived from маӈӈь 'задний'
ва̄нас adv "мало / slightly" ; !derived from ва̄ннҍ 'мало / some (adj)'
ме̄дас adv "по направлению ветра / with the wind" ; !derived from мӣдтҍ 'попутный'

! ?derived adverbs from nouns; suffix /-el't/ <-ельт> <-эльт> <-ӭльт>; weak grade
нюэзельт adv "плохо / badly" ; !derived from нюэссь '(что-то) плохое / bad'
ла̄шькэльт adv "лениво / lazily" ; !derived from ла̄шьк 'лень/ lazy'

! ?derived adverbs from adjectives; suffix ?/-nes't/ (looks like a poss3sg.loc)
мӣлкнесьт adv "тихонечко / медленно / slowly" ; !derived from мя̄лк

! ?derived adverbs from adjectives; suffix /-tenn'e/; strong grade
! historically, the /-t-/ must have been a coaffix (probably deriving a verb), that's why the strong grade appears 
шӣгктэнне adv "хорошо / well" ; !derived from шӣг 'хороший / good'
вэххтэнне adv "быстро / fast, quickly" ; !derived from вэхтэсь 'быстрый:attr / quick'

! ?derived adverbs from (derived) verbs; suffix /-enn'e/; no gradation
ӣннъенне adv "громко / loud" ; !derived from ӣннъе 'звучать / to sound, to resonate' (< ӣнн'голос / voice')
роаммъенне adv "радостно / gladly" ; !derived from ?роаммъе (< роамм 'радость / joy')
